Indiana, session 2026, HB1377.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 3-11-2-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 9. (a) The device of each political party
described in section 6 of this chapter shall be:
(1) enclosed in a circle not less than three-fourths (3/4) of an inch
in diameter; and
(2) placed under the name of the party or independent ticket, as
required by section 10 of this chapter.
(b) A device of a political party must not be printed on a ballot if:
(1) there are no candidates of that political party; or
(2) the only candidates:
(A) of the political party; or
(B) that have stated an affiliation with the political party under
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5);
are for election to school board offices or offices to which more
than one (1) individual is to be elected and which will not be
credited with a vote under IC 3-12-1-7 or IC 3-12-1-7.1 if a voter
casts a straight party ticket.
SECTION 2. IC 3-11-2-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10. (a) Public questions shall be placed on
the general election ballot in the following order after the statement
HEA 1377 — Concur

2
described in section 7 of this chapter, and the instructions described in
subsections (d) and (e) and section 8 of this chapter, if instructions are
printed on the ballot:
(1) Ratification of a state constitutional amendment.
(2) Local public questions.
Subject to section 10.1 of this chapter, each public question shall be
placed in a separate column on the ballot.
(b) The name or title of the political party shall be placed on the
general election ballot after the public questions described in
subsection (a). The device of the political party shall be placed
immediately under the name of the political party. Notwithstanding
section 8(b) of this chapter, the instructions for voting a straight party
ticket shall be placed to the right of the device on the ballot.
(c) The instructions for voting a straight party ticket must conform
as nearly as possible to the following:
"(1) You are not required to vote a straight party ticket. If you do
not wish to vote a straight party ticket, do not make a mark in this
section, and proceed to voting the ballot by office.
(2) To vote a straight (insert political party name) ticket for all
(insert political party name) candidates on this ballot, except for
candidates described in (3) below, make a voting mark on or in
this circle and do not make any other marks on this ballot.
(3) To vote for any candidate for
(A) an at-large office (insert county council, city common
council, town council, or township board if those offices
appear on this ballot) to which more than one (1) person may
be elected; or
(B) a school board office,
you must make another voting mark for each candidate you wish
to vote for. Your straight party vote will not count as a vote for
any candidate for that office.
(4) If you wish to vote for a candidate seeking a nonpartisan office
or on a public question, you must make another voting mark on
the appropriate place on this ballot.".
(d) Except as permitted under section 8(b) of this chapter, if the
ballot contains an independent ticket described in section 6 of this
chapter and at least one (1) other independent candidate, the ballot
must also contain a statement that reads substantially as follows: "A
vote cast for an independent ticket will only be counted for the
candidates for President and Vice President or governor and lieutenant
governor comprising that independent ticket. This vote will NOT be
counted for any OTHER independent candidate appearing on the
HEA 1377 — Concur

3
ballot.".
(e) Except as permitted under section 8(b) of this chapter, the ballot
must also contain a statement that reads substantially as follows: "A
write-in vote will NOT be counted unless the vote is for a DECLARED
write-in candidate. To vote for a write-in candidate, you must make a
voting mark on or in the square to the left of the name you have written
in or your vote will not be counted.".
(f) Subject to section 10.1 of this chapter, the list of candidates of
the political party shall be placed immediately under the instructions
for voting a straight party ticket. The names of the candidates shall be
placed three-fourths (3/4) of an inch apart from center to center of the
name. The name of each candidate must have, immediately on its left,
a square three-eighths (3/8) of an inch on each side.
(g) The circuit court clerk may authorize the printing of ballots
containing a ballot variation code to ensure that the proper version of
a ballot is used within a precinct.
SECTION 3. IC 3-11-2-12.4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2021,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12.4. (a) This section applies whenever more
than one (1) candidate may be elected to an office. However, this
section does not apply to a school board office.
(b) The office shall be placed on the general election ballot after the
offices described in section 12 of this chapter and before the offices
described in section 12.9 of this chapter.
(c) (b) Whenever candidates are to be elected to a county council,
city common council, or town council that includes both an at-large
member and a member representing a district, the candidates seeking
election as an at-large member shall be placed on the ballot before
candidates seeking to represent a district.
(d) (c) The ballot shall contain a statement reading substantially as
follows above the name of the first candidate: "To vote for any
candidate for this office, you must make a voting mark for each
candidate you wish to vote for.". A straight party vote will not count as
a vote for any candidate for this office.".
SECTION 4. IC 3-11-2-12.9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 12.9. (a) School board offices to be elected
at the general election shall be placed on the general election ballot
after the offices described in section 12.4 12 of this chapter.
(b) If the ballot contains a candidate for a school board office, the
ballot must also contain a statement that reads substantially as follows:
(1) "To vote for a candidate for this office, make a voting mark on
HEA 1377 — Concur

4
or in the square to the left of the candidate's name. A straight
party vote will not count as a vote for any candidate for this
office.", if only one (1) candidate is to be elected to a school
board office.
(2) "To vote for any candidate for this office, you must make
a voting mark for each candidate you wish to vote for. A
straight party vote will not count as a vote for any candidate
for this office.", if more than one (1) candidate is to be elected
to a school board office.
(c) Whenever candidates are to be elected to a school board office
that includes both an at-large member and a member representing a
district, the candidates seeking election as an at-large member shall be
placed on the ballot before candidates seeking to represent a district.
SECTION 5. IC 3-11-7-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 4. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
a ballot card voting system must permit a voter to vote:
(1) except at a primary election, a straight party ticket for all of
the candidates of one (1) political party by a single voting mark
on each ballot card;
(2) for one (1) or more candidates of each political party or
independent candidates, or for one (1) or more school board
candidates nominated by petition;
(3) a split ticket for the candidates of different political parties
and for independent candidates; or
(4) a straight party ticket and then split that ticket by casting
individual votes for candidates. of another political party or
independent candidate.
(b) A ballot card voting system must require that a voter who wishes
to cast a ballot for a candidate for election to a school board office or
an at-large district to which more than one (1) person may be elected,
on a:
(1) county council;
(2) city common council;
(3) town council; or
(4) township board;
make a voting mark for each individual candidate for whom the voter
wishes to cast a vote. The ballot card voting system may not count any
straight party ticket voting mark as a vote for any candidate for an
election to a school board office. described by this subsection.
(c) A ballot card voting system must permit a voter to vote:
(1) for all candidates for presidential electors and alternate
HEA 1377 — Concur

5
presidential electors of a political party or an independent ticket
by making a single voting mark; and
(2) for or against a public question on which the voter may vote.
SECTION 6. IC 3-11-7.5-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
an electronic voting system must permit a voter to vote:
(1) except at a primary election, a straight party ticket for all the
candidates of one (1) political party by touching the device of that
party;
(2) for one (1) or more candidates of each political party or
independent candidates, or for one (1) or more school board
candidates nominated by petition;
(3) a split ticket for the candidates of different political parties
and for independent candidates; or
(4) a straight party ticket and then split that ticket by casting
individual votes for candidates. of another political party or
independent candidates.
(b) An electronic voting system must require that a voter who
wishes to cast a ballot for a candidate for election to a school board
office or an at-large district to which more than one (1) person may be
elected, on a:
(1) county council;
(2) city common council;
(3) town council; or
(4) township board;
make a voting mark for each individual candidate for whom the voter
wishes to cast a vote. The electronic voting system may not count any
straight party ticket voting mark as a vote for any candidate for an
election to a school board office. described by this subsection.
(c) An electronic voting system must permit a voter to vote:
(1) for as many candidates for an office as the voter may vote for,
but no more;
(2) for or against a public question on which the voter may vote,
but no other; and
(3) for all the candidates for presidential electors and alternate
presidential electors of a political party or an independent ticket
by making a single voting mark.
SECTION 7. IC 3-11-11-10, AS AMENDED BY P.L.227-2023,
SECTION 91, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 10. If an election is a general or municipal
election and a voter desires to vote for all the candidates of one (1)
HEA 1377 — Concur

6
political party or group of petitioners, the voter may make a voting
mark on or in a large circle enclosing the device and before the name
under which the candidates of the party are printed. The voter's vote
shall then be counted for all the candidates under that party name. in
accordance with IC 3-12-1.
SECTION 8. IC 3-11-13-11, AS AMENDED BY SEA 25-2026,
SECTION 2, AND BY THE TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF
THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 11. (a) The ballot
information, whether placed on the ballot card or on the marking
device, must be in the order of arrangement provided for ballots under
this section.
(b) Each county election board shall have the names of all
candidates for all elected offices, political party offices, and public
questions printed on a ballot card as provided in this chapter. The
county may:
(1) print all offices and questions on a single ballot card; and
(2) include a ballot variation code to ensure that the proper
version of a ballot is used within a precinct.
(c) Each type of ballot card must be of uniform size and of the same
quality and color of paper (except as permitted under IC 3-10-1-17).
(d) The nominees of a political party or an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6) nominated by
petitioners shall be listed on the ballot with the name and device set
forth on the certification or petition. The circle containing the device
may be of any size that permits a voter to readily identify the device.
IC 3-11-2-5 applies if the certification or petition does not include a
name or device, or if the same device is selected by two (2) or more
parties or petitioners. In the case of a candidate described in
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), a blank space must be printed after the
candidate's name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any
affiliation with a political party or that the candidate:
(1) is not affiliated with a political party; and
(2) does not identify as an independent candidate.
(e) The offices and public questions on the general election ballot
must be placed on the ballot in the order listed in IC 3-11-2-12,
IC 3-11-2-12.4, IC 3-11-2-12.5, IC 3-11-2-12.7(b), IC 3-11-2-12.9(a),
IC 3-11-2-12.9(c), IC 3-11-2-13(a) through IC 3-11-2-13(c),
IC 3-11-2-14(a), IC 3-11-2-14(d), and IC 3-11-2-14(e). The offices and
public questions may be listed in a continuous column either vertically
or horizontally and on a number of separate pages.
(f) The name of each office must be printed in a uniform size in bold
HEA 1377 — Concur

7
type. A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate:
(1) "Vote for one (1) only.", if only one (1) candidate is to be
elected to the office.
(2) "Vote for not more than (insert the number of candidates to be
elected) candidate(s) for this office. To vote for any candidate for
this office, you must make a voting mark for each candidate you
wish to vote for.", A straight party vote will not count as a vote for
any candidate for this office.", if more than one (1) candidate is to
be elected to the office.
(3) "Vote for not more than (insert the number of candidates
to be elected) candidate(s) for this office. To vote for any
candidate for this office, you must make a voting mark for
each candidate you wish to vote for. A straight party vote will
not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.", if more
than one (1) candidate is to be elected to a school board office.
(3) (4) "Vote for one (1) only. A straight party vote will not count
as a vote for any candidate for this office.", if only one (1)
candidate is to be elected to a school board office.
(g) Below the name of the office and the statement required by
subsection (f), the names of the candidates for each office must be
grouped together in the following order:
(1) The major political party whose candidate received the highest
number of votes in the county for secretary of state at the last
election is listed first.
(2) The major political party whose candidate received the second
highest number of votes in the county for secretary of state is
listed second.
(3) All other political parties listed in the order that the parties'
candidates for secretary of state finished in the last election are
listed after the party listed in subdivision (2).
(4) If a political party did not have a candidate for secretary of
state in the last election or a nominee is an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6), the party or
candidate is listed after the parties described in subdivisions (1),
(2), and (3).
(5) If more than one (1) political party or independent candidate
or ticket described in subdivision (4) qualifies to be on the ballot,
the parties, candidates, or tickets are listed in the order in which
the party filed its petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6-12.
(6) The name of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C)
HEA 1377 — Concur

8
is placed after the candidates listed in subdivisions (1) through
(5), if applicable.
(7) A space for write-in voting is placed after the candidates listed
in subdivisions (1) through (6), if required by law.
(8) The name of a write-in candidate may not be listed on the
ballot.
If there is more than one (1) candidate for a grouping described in
subdivisions (1) through (8) for a school board office, the candidates
shall appear in the order established by this subsection and within the
grouping, in alphabetical order according to surname.
(h) The names of the candidates grouped in the order established by
subsection (g) must be printed in type with uniform capital letters and
have a uniform space between each name. The name of the candidate's
political party, or the word "Independent" if the:
(1) candidate; or
(2) ticket of candidates for:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States; or
(B) governor and lieutenant governor;
is independent, must be placed immediately below or beside the name
of the candidate and must be printed in a uniform size and type. In the
case of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), the name of
the candidate must be printed with a blank space after the candidate's
name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any affiliation
with a political party or that the candidate is not affiliated with a
political party and does not identify as an independent candidate.
(i) All the candidates of the same political party for election to
at-large seats on the fiscal or legislative body of a political subdivision
must be grouped together:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
(2) in the order established by subsection (g); and
(3) within the political party, in alphabetical order according to
surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) of ANY party for this office.".
(j) Candidates for election to at-large seats on the governing body
of a school corporation must be grouped:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
and
(2) in alphabetical order according to surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
HEA 1377 — Concur

9
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) for this office. A straight party
vote will not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.".
(k) The following information must be placed at the top of the ballot
before the first public question is listed:
(1) The cautionary statement described in IC 3-11-2-7.
(2) The instructions described in IC 3-11-2-8, IC 3-11-2-10(d),
and IC 3-11-2-10(e).
(l) The ballot must include a single connectable arrow, circle, oval,
or square, or a voting position for voting a straight party ticket by one
(1) mark as required by section 14 of this chapter, and the single
connectable arrow, circle, oval, or square, or the voting position for
casting a straight party ticket ballot must be identified by:
(1) the name of the political party; and
(2) immediately below or beside the political party's name, the
device of that party (described in IC 3-11-2-5).
The name and device of each political party must be of uniform size
and type and arranged in the order established by subsection (g) for
listing candidates under each office. The instructions described in
IC 3-11-2-10(c) for voting a straight party ticket and the statement
concerning presidential electors required under IC 3-10-4-3 must be
placed on the ballot label. The instructions for voting a straight party
ticket must include the statement: "If you do not wish to vote a straight
party ticket, do not make a mark in this section and proceed to voting
the ballot by office.".
(m) A public question must be in the form described in
IC 3-11-2-15(a) and IC 3-11-2-15(b), except that a single connectable
arrow, a circle, or an oval may be used instead of a square. Except as
expressly authorized or required by statute, a county election board
may not print a ballot card that contains language concerning the public
question other than the language authorized by a statute.
(n) The requirements in this section:
(1) do not replace; and
(2) are in addition to;
any other requirements in this title that apply to optical scan ballots.
(o) The procedure described in IC 3-11-2-16 must be used when a
ballot does not comply with the requirements imposed by this title or
contains another error or omission that might result in confusion or
mistakes by voters.
(p) This subsection applies to an optical scan ballot that does not
list:
HEA 1377 — Concur

10
(1) the names of political parties or candidates; or
(2) the text of public questions;
on the face of the ballot. The ballot must be prepared in accordance
with this section, except that the ballot must include a numbered circle
or oval to refer to each political party, candidate, or public question.
SECTION 9. IC 3-11-13-14, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 14. (a) In partisan elections, the ballot labels
must include a voting square or position where a voter may by one (1)
voting mark on each card record a straight party ticket vote for all the
candidates of one (1) political party, except for offices for which the
voter:
(1) is required to cast an individual vote for a candidate under
IC 3-11-7-4(b); or
(2) has voted individually for a candidate for any other office.
(b) A ballot label must not include a voting square or position to
permit a voter to cast a straight party ticket for a political party if:
(1) there are no candidates of that political party; or
(2) the only candidates:
(A) of the political party; or
(B) that have stated an affiliation with the political party under
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5);
are for election to school board offices or offices to which more
than one (1) individual is to be elected and which will not be
credited with a vote under IC 3-12-1-7 or IC 3-12-1-7.1 if a voter
casts a straight party ticket.
SECTION 10. IC 3-11-14-3.5, AS AMENDED BY SEA 25-2026,
SECTION 3, AND BY THE TECHNICAL CORRECTIONS BILL OF
THE 2026 GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 3.5. (a) Each
county election board shall have the names of all candidates for all
elected offices, political party offices, and public questions printed on
ballot labels for use in an electronic voting system as provided in this
chapter.
(b) The county may:
(1) print all offices and public questions on a single ballot label;
and
(2) include a ballot variation code to ensure that the proper
version of a ballot label is used within a precinct.
(c) Each type of ballot label must be of uniform size and of the same
quality and color of paper (except as permitted under IC 3-10-1-17).
(d) The nominees of a political party or an independent candidate
HEA 1377 — Concur

11
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6) nominated by
petitioners must be listed on the ballot label with the name and device
set forth on the certification or petition. The circle containing the
device may be of any size that permits a voter to readily identify the
device. IC 3-11-2-5 applies if the certification or petition does not
include a name or device, or if the same device is selected by two (2)
or more parties or petitioners. In the case of a candidate described in
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), a blank space must be printed after the
candidate's name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any
affiliation with a political party or that the candidate:
(1) is not affiliated with a political party; and
(2) does not identify as an independent candidate.
(e) The ballot labels must list the offices and public questions on the
general election ballot in the order listed in IC 3-11-2-12,
IC 3-11-2-12.4, IC 3-11-2-12.5, IC 3-11-2-12.7(b), IC 3-11-2-12.9(a),
IC 3-11-2-12.9(c), IC 3-11-2-13(a) through IC 3-11-2-13(c),
IC 3-11-2-14(a), IC 3-11-2-14(d), and IC 3-11-2-14(e). Each office and
public question may have a separate screen, or the offices and public
questions may be listed in a continuous column either vertically or
horizontally.
(f) The name of each office must be printed in a uniform size in bold
type. A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate:
(1) "Vote for one (1) only.", if only one (1) candidate is to be
elected to the office.
(2) "Vote for not more than (insert the number of candidates to be
elected) candidate(s) for this office. To vote for any candidate for
this office, you must make a voting mark for each candidate you
wish to vote for.", A straight party vote will not count as a vote for
any candidate for this office.", if more than one (1) candidate is to
be elected to the office.
(3) "Vote for not more than (insert the number of candidates
to be elected) candidate(s) for this office. To vote for any
candidate for this office, you must make a voting mark for
each candidate you wish to vote for. A straight party vote will
not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.", if more
than one (1) candidate is to be elected to a school board office.
(3) (4) "Vote for one (1) only. A straight party vote will not count
as a vote for any candidate for this office.", if only one (1)
candidate is to be elected to a school board office.
(g) Below the name of the office and the statement required by
HEA 1377 — Concur

12
subsection (f), the names of the candidates for each office must be
grouped together in the following order:
(1) The major political party whose candidate received the highest
number of votes in the county for secretary of state at the last
election is listed first.
(2) The major political party whose candidate received the second
highest number of votes in the county for secretary of state is
listed second.
(3) All other political parties listed in the order that the parties'
candidates for secretary of state finished in the last election are
listed after the party listed in subdivision (2).
(4) If a political party did not have a candidate for secretary of
state in the last election or a nominee is an independent candidate
or independent ticket (described in IC 3-11-2-6), the party or
candidate is listed after the parties described in subdivisions (1),
(2), and (3).
(5) If more than one (1) political party or independent candidate
or ticket described in subdivision (4) qualifies to be on the ballot,
the parties, candidates, or tickets are listed in the order in which
the party filed its petition of nomination under IC 3-8-6-12.
(6) The name of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C)
is placed after the candidates listed in subdivisions (1) through
(5), if applicable.
(7) A space for write-in voting is placed after the candidates listed
in subdivisions (1) through (6), if required by law. A space for
write-in voting for an office is not required if there are no
declared write-in candidates for that office. However, procedures
must be implemented to permit write-in voting for candidates for
federal offices.
(8) The name of a write-in candidate may not be listed on the
ballot.
If there is more than one (1) candidate for a grouping described in
subdivisions (1) through (8) for a school board office, the candidates
shall appear in the order established by this subsection and within the
grouping, in alphabetical order according to surname.
(h) The names of the candidates grouped in the order established by
subsection (g) must be printed in type with uniform capital letters and
have a uniform space between each name. The name of the candidate's
political party, or the word "Independent", if the:
(1) candidate; or
(2) ticket of candidates for:
(A) President and Vice President of the United States; or
HEA 1377 — Concur

13
(B) governor and lieutenant governor;
is independent, must be placed immediately below or beside the name
of the candidate and must be printed in uniform size and type. In the
case of a candidate described in IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5)(C), the name of
the candidate must be printed with a blank space after the candidate's
name signifying that the candidate elects not to disclose any affiliation
with a political party or that the candidate is not affiliated with a
political party and does not identify as an independent candidate.
(i) All the candidates of the same political party for election to
at-large seats on the fiscal or legislative body of a political subdivision
must be grouped together:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
(2) in the party order established by subsection (g); and
(3) within the political party, in alphabetical order according to
surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) of ANY party for this office.".
(j) Candidates for election to at-large seats on the governing body
of a school corporation must be grouped:
(1) under the name of the office that the candidates are seeking;
and
(2) in alphabetical order according to surname.
A statement reading substantially as follows must be placed
immediately below the name of the office and above the name of the
first candidate: "Vote for not more than (insert the number of
candidates to be elected) candidate(s) for this office. A straight party
vote will not count as a vote for any candidate for this office.".
(k) The cautionary statement described in IC 3-11-2-7 must be
placed at the top or beginning of the ballot label before the first public
question is listed.
(l) The instructions described in IC 3-11-2-8, IC 3-11-2-10(d), and
IC 3-11-2-10(e) may be:
(1) placed on the ballot label; or
(2) posted in a location within the voting booth that permits the
voter to easily read the instructions.
(m) Except as provided in section 14.5 of this chapter, the ballot
label must include a touch sensitive point or button for voting a straight
political party ticket by one (1) touch, and the touch sensitive point or
button must be identified by:
(1) the name of the political party; and
HEA 1377 — Concur

14
(2) immediately below or beside the political party's name, the
device of that party (described in IC 3-11-2-5).
The name and device of each party must be of uniform size and type,
and arranged in the order established by subsection (g) for listing
candidates under each office. The instructions described in
IC 3-11-2-10(c) for voting a straight party ticket and the statement
concerning presidential electors required under IC 3-10-4-3 must be
placed on the ballot label. The instructions for voting a straight party
ticket must include the statement: "If you do not wish to vote a straight
party ticket, press "NEXT" (or replace "NEXT" with the term used by
that voting system to permit a voter to skip a ballot screen) to continue
voting.".
(n) A public question must be in the form described in
IC 3-11-2-15(a) and IC 3-11-2-15(b), except that a touch sensitive
point or button must be used instead of a square. Except as expressly
authorized or required by statute, a county election board may not print
a ballot label that contains language concerning the public question
other than the language authorized by a statute.
(o) The requirements in this section:
(1) do not replace; and
(2) are in addition to;
any other requirements in this title that apply to ballots for electronic
voting systems.
(p) The procedure described in IC 3-11-2-16 must be used when a
ballot label does not comply with the requirements imposed by this title
or contains another error or omission that might result in confusion or
mistakes by voters.
SECTION 11. IC 3-11-14-14.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 13, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 14.5. A ballot label must not include a touch
sensitive point or button to permit a voter to cast a straight party ticket
for a political party if:
(1) there are no candidates of that political party; or
(2) the only candidates:
(A) of the political party; or
(B) that have stated an affiliation with the political party under
IC 3-8-2.5-2.5(a)(5);
are for election to school board offices or offices to which more
than one (1) individual is to be elected and which will not be
credited with a vote under IC 3-12-1-7 or IC 3-12-1-7.1 if a voter
casts a straight party ticket.
SECTION 12. IC 3-12-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
HEA 1377 — Concur

15
SECTION 14, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 5. (a) This subsection does not apply to a
ballot card voting system or an electronic voting system. Except as
provided in subsection (d), a voting mark made by a voter on or in a
voting square at the left of a candidate's name or political party's name
shall be counted as a vote for the candidate or candidates of the
political party.
(b) This subsection applies to a ballot card voting system. A voting
mark made by a voter:
(1) on or in a circle, oval, or square; or
(2) to connect a connectable arrow;
immediately below or beside a candidate's name or political party's
name shall be counted as a vote for the candidate or candidates of the
political party, except as provided in subsection (d).
(c) This subsection applies to a direct record electronic voting
system. A voting mark made by a voter touching a touch sensitive point
or button below or beside a candidate's name or political party's name
shall be counted as a vote for the candidate or candidates of the
political party, except as provided in subsection (d).
(d) A voter who wishes to cast a ballot for a candidate for election
to a school board office or an at-large district to which more than one
(1) person may be elected on a:
(1) county council;
(2) city common council;
(3) town council; or
(4) township board;
must make a voting mark for each individual candidate for whom the
voter wishes to cast a vote. A straight ticket voting mark on a paper
ballot, ballot card voting system, or electronic voting system shall not
be counted as a straight party ticket voting mark as a vote for any
candidate for an a school board office. described by this subsection.
SECTION 13. IC 3-12-1-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.21-2016,
SECTION 23, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 7. (a) This subsection applies whenever a
voter:
(1) votes a straight party ticket; and
(2) votes only for one (1) or more individual candidates who are
all of the same political party as the straight ticket vote.
Except as provided in subsection (d), or (e), the straight ticket vote
shall be counted and the individual candidate votes may not be
counted.
(b) This subsection applies whenever:
HEA 1377 — Concur

16
(1) a voter has voted a straight party ticket for the candidates of
one (1) political party;
(2) only one (1) person may be elected to an office; and
(3) the voter has voted for one (1) individual candidate for the
office described in subdivision (2) who is:
(A) a candidate of a political party other than the party for
which the voter voted a straight ticket; or
(B) an independent candidate or declared write-in candidate
for the office.
If the voter has voted for one (1) individual candidate for the office
described in subdivision (2), the individual candidate vote for that
office shall be counted, the straight party ticket vote for that office may
not be counted, and the straight party ticket votes for other offices on
the ballot shall be counted.
(c) This subsection applies whenever:
(1) a voter has voted a straight party ticket for the candidates of
one (1) political party; and
(2) the voter has voted for more individual candidates for the
office than the number of persons to be elected to that office.
The individual candidate votes for that office may not be counted, the
straight party ticket vote for that office may not be counted, and the
straight party ticket votes for other offices on the ballot shall be
counted.
(d) This subsection applies whenever:
(1) a voter has voted a straight party ticket for the candidates of
one (1) political party;
(2) more than one (1) person may be elected to an office; and
(3) the voter has voted for one (1) or more individual candidates
for the office described in subdivision (2) who are:
(A) independent candidates or declared write-in candidates;
(B) candidates of a political party other than the political party
for which the voter cast a straight party ticket under
subdivision (1); or
(C) candidates of the same political party for which the
voter cast a straight party ticket under subdivision (1); or
(C) (D) a combination of candidates described in clauses (A),
and (B), and (C).
The individual votes cast by the voter for the office for the independent
candidates, declared write-in candidates, and the candidates of a
political party other than the political party for which the voter cast a
straight party ticket shall be counted unless the total number of these
individual votes is greater than the number of persons to be elected to
HEA 1377 — Concur

17
the office. The straight party ticket votes for the office shall not be
counted. The straight party ticket votes for other offices on the voter's
ballot shall be counted.
(e) This subsection applies whenever:
(1) a voter has voted a straight party ticket for the candidates of
one (1) political party;
(2) more than one (1) person may be elected to an office; and
(3) the voter has voted for individual candidates for the office
described in subdivision (2) who are:
(A) independent candidates, declared write-in candidates, or
candidates of a political party other than the political party for
which the voter cast a straight party ticket under subdivision
(1); and
(B) candidates of the same political party for which the voter
cast a straight party ticket under subdivision (1).
The individual votes cast by the voter for the office for the independent
candidates, the declared write-in candidates, and the candidates of a
political party other than the political party for which the voter cast a
straight party ticket, and the candidates of the political party for which
the voter cast a straight party ticket shall be counted unless the total
number of these individual votes is greater than the number of persons
to be elected to the office. The straight party ticket votes for the office
shall not be counted. The straight party ticket votes for other offices on
the voter's ballot shall be counted.
(f) (e) If a voter votes a straight party ticket for more than one (1)
political party, the whole ballot is void with regard to all candidates
nominated by a political party, declared write-in candidates, or
candidates designated as independent candidates on the ballot.
However, the voter's vote for a school board candidate or on a public
question shall be counted if otherwise valid under this chapter.
(g) (f) If a voter does not vote a straight party ticket and the number
of votes cast by that voter for the candidates for an office are less than
or equal to the number of openings for that office, the individual
candidates votes shall be counted.
(h) (g) If a voter does not vote a straight party ticket and the number
of votes cast by that voter for an office exceeds the number of openings
for that office, none of the votes concerning that office may be counted.
SECTION 14. IC 3-12-1-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 16, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 8. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b),
a voting mark made by a voter on or in a circle containing a political
party device shall be counted as a vote for each candidate of that
HEA 1377 — Concur

18
political party on that ballot.
(b) A voter who wishes to cast a ballot for a candidate for election
to a school board office or an at-large district to which more than one
(1) person may be elected on a:
(1) county council;
(2) city common council;
(3) town council; or
(4) township board;
must make a voting mark for each individual candidate for whom the
voter wishes to cast a vote. A voting mark on or in a circle containing
a political party device shall not be counted as a straight party ticket
voting mark as a vote for any candidate for an a school board office.
described by this subsection.
SECTION 15. IC 3-12-1-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.195-2025,
SECTION 17, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]: Sec. 15. (a) This section does not apply to a
candidate for a school board office, or an at-large office of a county
council, city common council, town council, or township board, if those
offices appear a school board office appears on a ballot.
(b) This section applies to a vote cast for one (1) straight party ticket
that includes a candidate for election to office who:
(1) ceases to be a candidate; and
(2) is succeeded by a candidate selected under IC 3-13-1 or
IC 3-13-2.
(c) A vote cast in the election for the original nominee is considered
a vote cast for the successor.
HEA 1377 — Concur

Speaker of the House of Representatives
President of the Senate
President Pro Tempore
Governor of the State of Indiana
Date: Time:
HEA 1377 — Concur